Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB30.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and to the extent permitted
under federal law, including but not limited to the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, an adult, the parent or legal
guardian of a minor, or the guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated
individual who is receiving residential services under a federally approved
1915(c) home and community based services waiver program, as defined in 907
KAR 7:005 sec. 1, may waive a right to privacy for the limited purpose of
installing, or to cause the installation of, video recording devices in the private
residential room of the individual receiving services.
(2) The cabinet shall, withing ninety (90) days after the effective date of this Act,
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
carry out the provisions of this section, including but not limited:
(a) The creation of a privacy waiver form;
(b) Requirements for notifying the residential service provider of the intent to
install a recording device in the private residential room of an individual
receiving services;
(c) Standards for securing, maintaining, and distributing or using video
recordings; and
(d) Procedures for installing recording devices in shared or semi-private
residential rooms.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed as requiring the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services, the Medicaid program, any other state agency, or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/19/2024 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 42
a residential service provider to provide video recording devices or funding for
video recording devices. All cost associated with video recording devices and the
installation of the devices shall be the responsibility of the individual resident or
his or her parent or guardian.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/19/2024 9:32 AM Jacketed